Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1453
Remedies; administration and enforcement; duty to mitigate damages.

(1) The remedies provided by the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act shall be so administered that the aggrieved party may recover appropriate damages. The aggrieved party shall have a duty to mitigate damages.

(2) Any right or obligation declared by the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act shall be enforceable by action unless the provision declaring it specifies a different and limited effect.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 4.